Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 18.31.500.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“asbestos” means chrysotile, amosite, crocidolite, fibrous tremolite, fibrous anthophyllite, and fibrous actinolite;

“asbestos health hazard” means the presence of material containing asbestos that carries a risk of releasing asbestos fibers into the atmosphere.

History.

(§ 2 ch 71 SLA 1985; am § 38 ch 30 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 18.28.500.
Renumbered in 1985.